Washington statutes.
RCW 10.05.130

Services provided for indigent defendants.

Funds shall be appropriated from the fines and forfeitures of the court to provide investigation, examination, report and treatment plan for any indigent person who is unable to pay the cost of any program of treatment.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 244 s 13.]